algorithms/estonian_freienthal.sbl
/* Estonian stemmer version 1.3
 *
 * Made by Linda Freienthal in January 2019.
 *
 * ---
 *
 * Estonian language stemmer
 *
 * Source obtained from https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/estonian/stemmer.html,
 * under the BSD public license, created by Linda Freienthal in 2019.
 */

routines (
    mark_regions
    LONGV
    special_noun_endings
    case_ending
    emphasis
    plural_three_first_cases
    undouble_kpt
    i_plural
    degrees
    substantive
    verb_exceptions
    verb
    nu
)

stringescapes {}

stringdef a" '{U+00E4}' //a-umlaut ä
stringdef o" '{U+00F6}' //o-umlaut ö
stringdef o~ '{U+00F5}' //o with tilde õ
stringdef u" '{U+00FC}' //u-umlaut ü
stringdef sv '{U+0161}' //s-caron š
stringdef zv '{U+017E}' //z-caron ž

externals ( stem )
integers ( p1 )
groupings ( V1 RV KI GI)

define V1 'aeiou{o~}{a"}{o"}{u"}'
define RV 'aeiuo'
define KI 'kptgbdshf{sv}z{zv}'
define GI 'cjlmnqrvwxaeiou{o~}{a"}{o"}{u"}'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit

    goto V1 gopast non-V1  setmark p1
)


backwardmode (

    define emphasis as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        test hop 4 //kingi -> kingi
        among(
            'gi' ((GI and not LONGV) delete) //jookse-me-gi, bioloogi -> bioloogi
            'ki' (KI delete) //kookki -> kook
        )

    )

    // Signals t is a replacement was made; f otherwise.
    define verb as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'nuksin' 'nuksime' 'nuksid' 'nuksite' (delete) //seleta-nuksite
            'ksin' 'ksid' 'ksime' 'ksite' (delete) //personal conditional: rõõmusta-ksin
            'mata' (delete)
            'takse' 'dakse' (delete) //impersonal: laul-dakse, luba-takse
            'taks' 'daks' (delete)   //impersonal conditional: laul-daks, saade-taks
            'akse' (<-'a')           //impersonal: tulla-kse, süüa-kse (-> söö), teha-kse (-> tegi), püüta-kse, leita-kse
            'sime' (delete)          //pl1pst: saat-sime
            'site' (delete)          //pl2pst: saat-site
            'sin' (delete)           //sg1pst: laul-sin, saat-sin
            'me' (V1 delete)         //pl1prs: laula-me, tule-me
            'da' (V1 delete)         //da-infinitive: luba-da
            'n' (V1 delete)          //sg1prs: kirjuta-n
            'b' (V1 delete)          //sg3prs: laula-b
        )
    )

    define LONGV as
        among('aa' 'ee' 'ii' 'oo' 'uu' '{a"}{a"}' '{o"}{o"}' '{u"}{u"}' '{o~}{o~}')

    define i_plural as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'i' (RV) //raama-tu-i, lapsiku-i
        )
        delete
    )

    define special_noun_endings as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'lasse' (<- 'lase') //teadlasse -> teadlase
            'last' (<- 'lase') //teadlast -> teadlase
            'lane' (<- 'lase') //teadlane -> teadlase
            'lasi'(<- 'lase') //teadlasi -> teadlase
            'misse' (<- 'mise') //tegemisse -> tegemise
            'mist' (<- 'mise') //kasutamist -> kasutamise
            'mine' (<- 'mise') //tegemine -> tegemise
            'misi' (<- 'mise') //kasutamisi -> kasutamise
            'lisse' (<- 'lise') //rohelisse -> rohelise
            'list' (<- 'lise') //tavalist -> tavalise
            'line' (<- 'lise') //roheline -> rohelise
            'lisi' (<- 'lise') //tavalisi -> tavalise
        )
    )

    define case_ending as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'sse' (RV or LONGV) //illative: saapa-sse
            'st' (RV or LONGV) //elative: saapa-st and kapsas-t
            'le' (RV or LONGV) //allative: raama-tu-le
            'lt' (RV or LONGV) //ablative: raama-tu-lt
            'ga' (RV or LONGV) //komitatiive: õpetaja-ga
            'ks' (RV or LONGV) //translative: õpetaja-ks
            'ta' (RV or LONGV) //abessive and da-infinitive: õpetaja-ta and hüpa-ta
            't'  (test hop 4)  //partitiiv, raamatu-t
            's'  (RV or LONGV) //inessive and sg3pst: raama-tu-s and sõiti-s
            'l'  (RV or LONGV) //adessive: raama-tu-l and kapsa-l.
        )
        delete
    )


    define plural_three_first_cases as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'ikkude' (<-'iku') //plural genitive: õnnelikkude -> õnneliku
            'ikke' (<-'iku') //plural partitive: rahulikke -> rahuliku
            'ike' (<-'iku') //plural genitive: ohtlike -> ohtliku
            'sid' (not LONGV delete) //plural partitive and sg2pst and pl3pst: auto-sid and laul-sid (exludes plural nominative with words like gaasid, roosid)
            // plural genitive and pl2: ministri-te, oluliste -> olulise and saada-te, laula-te;
            // also torte -> tort (if not in compound word) and kokkuvõtte -> kokkuvõte and roheliste -> rohelise, tegemiste -> tegemise, teadlaste -> teadlase
            'te' (
                (test hop 4
                  among (
                    'mis' 'las' 'lis' (<- 'e')
                    't' ()
                    '' (delete)
                  )
                ) or <- 't'
            )
            'de' ((RV or LONGV) delete) //plural genitive: lauda-de
            'd' ((RV or LONGV) delete) //plural nominative: voodi-d, rattai-d (rata), lapsiku-i-d
        )
    )

    define nu as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'nu' //haka-nu(-te-ga)
            'tu' //luba-tu(-d)
            'du' //laul-du(-te-st)
            'va' //laul-va(-te-le)
        )
        delete
    )

    define undouble_kpt as (
        // undouble '-C1C1V' where C1 is k, p or t:
        // mõtte(-le) -> mõte, hakka(-n) -> haka
        //
        // We only undouble if the vowel is in R1 to avoid modifying short
        // non-words (mostly to avoid modifying acronyms/initialisms which such
        // as "PPE").
        V1 $(p1 <= cursor)
        [substring] among(
            'kk' (<- 'k')
            'pp' (<- 'p')
            'tt' (<- 't')
        )
    )

    define degrees as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'mai' (RV delete) //heleda-mai(-le)
            'ma' (delete)  //tuge-va-ma(-le) and ma-infinitive: sõit-ma
            'm' (RV delete) //kauge-i-m, rõõmsa-m
        )
    )

    define substantive as (
        do special_noun_endings
        do case_ending
        do plural_three_first_cases
        do degrees
        do i_plural
        do nu
    )
)


define verb_exceptions as (
    [substring] atlimit
    among(
        'joon' 'jood' 'joob' 'joote' 'joome' 'joovad' (<-'joo')
        'j{o~}in' 'j{o~}id' 'j{o~}i' 'j{o~}ime' 'j{o~}ite'  (<-'joo')
        'joomata' 'juuakse' 'joodakse' 'juua' 'jooma' (<- 'joo')
        'saan' 'saad' 'saab' 'saate' 'saame' 'saavad' (<-'saa')
        'saaksin' 'saaksid' 'saaks' 'saaksite' 'saaksime' (<-'saa')
        'sain' 'said' 'sai' 'saite' 'saime' (<-'saa')
        'saamata' 'saadakse' 'saadi' 'saama' 'saada' (<-'saa')
        'viin' 'viid' 'viib' 'viite' 'viime' 'viivad' (<-'viima')
        'viiksin' 'viiksid' 'viiks' 'viiksite' 'viiksime' (<-'viima')
        'viisin' 'viisite' 'viisime' (<-'viima')
        'viimata' 'viiakse' 'viidi' 'viima' 'viia' (<-'viima')
        'keen' 'keeb' 'keed' 'kees' 'keeme' 'keete' 'keevad' (<-'keesi')
        'keeksin' 'keeks' 'keeksid' 'keeksime' 'keeksite' (<-'keesi')
        'keemata' 'keema' 'keeta' 'keedakse' (<-'keesi')
        'l{o"}{o"}n' 'l{o"}{o"}d' 'l{o"}{o"}b' 'l{o"}{o"}me' 'l{o"}{o"}te' 'l{o"}{o"}vad'  (<-'l{o"}{o"}')
        'l{o"}{o"}ksin' 'l{o"}{o"}ksid' 'l{o"}{o"}ks' 'l{o"}{o"}ksime' 'l{o"}{o"}ksite' (<-'l{o"}{o"}')
        'l{o"}{o"}mata' 'l{u"}{u"}akse' 'l{o"}{o"}dakse' 'l{o"}{o"}di' 'l{o"}{o"}ma' 'l{u"}{u"}a' (<-'l{o"}{o"}')
        // Both looma and lööma have these same past tense forms
        'l{o~}in' 'l{o~}id' 'l{o~}i' 'l{o~}ime' 'l{o~}ite' (<-'l{o~}i')
        'loon' 'lood' 'loob' 'loome' 'loote' 'loovad' (<-'loo')
        'looksin' 'looksid' 'looks' 'looksime' 'looksite' (<-'loo')
        'loomata' 'luuakse' 'loodi' 'luua' 'looma' (<-'loo')
        'k{a"}in' 'k{a"}ib' 'k{a"}id' 'k{a"}is' 'k{a"}ime' 'k{a"}ite' 'k{a"}ivad' (<-'k{a"}isi')
        'k{a"}iksin' 'k{a"}iks' 'k{a"}iksid' 'k{a"}iksime' 'k{a"}iksite' (<-'k{a"}isi')
        'k{a"}imata' 'k{a"}iakse' 'k{a"}idi' 'k{a"}ia' 'k{a"}ima' (<-'k{a"}isi')
        's{o"}{o"}n' 's{o"}{o"}b' 's{o"}{o"}d' 's{o"}{o"}me' 's{o"}{o"}te' 's{o"}{o"}vad' (<-'s{o"}{o"}')
        's{o"}{o"}ksin' 's{o"}{o"}ks' 's{o"}{o"}ksid' 's{o"}{o"}ksime' 's{o"}{o"}ksite' (<-'s{o"}{o"}')
        's{o~}in' 's{o~}i' 's{o~}id' 's{o~}ime' 's{o~}ite' (<-'s{o"}{o"}')
        's{o"}{o"}mata' 's{u"}{u"}akse' 's{o"}{o"}dakse' 's{o"}{o"}di' 's{o"}{o"}ma' 's{u"}{u"}a' (<-'s{o"}{o"}')
        'toon' 'tood' 'toob' 'toote' 'toome' 'toovad' (<-'too')
        'tooksin' 'tooksid' 'tooks' 'tooksite' 'tooksime' (<-'too')
        't{o~}in' 't{o~}id' 't{o~}i' 't{o~}ime' 't{o~}ite' (<-'too')
        'toomata' 'tuuakse' 'toodi' 'tooma' 'tuua' (<-'too')
        'v{o~}in' 'v{o~}id' 'v{o~}ib' 'v{o~}ime' 'v{o~}is' 'v{o~}ite' 'v{o~}ivad' (<-'v{o~}isi')
        'v{o~}iksin' 'v{o~}iksid' 'v{o~}iks' 'v{o~}iksime' 'v{o~}iksite' (<-'v{o~}isi')
        'v{o~}imata' 'v{o~}idakse' 'v{o~}idi' 'v{o~}ida' 'v{o~}ima' (<-'v{o~}isi')
        'j{a"}{a"}n' 'j{a"}{a"}d' 'j{a"}{a"}b' 'j{a"}{a"}me' 'j{a"}{a"}te' 'j{a"}{a"}vad' (<-'j{a"}{a"}ma')
        'j{a"}{a"}ksin' 'j{a"}{a"}ksid' 'j{a"}{a"}ks' 'j{a"}{a"}ksime' 'j{a"}{a"}ksite' (<-'j{a"}{a"}ma')
        'j{a"}ime' 'j{a"}ite' 'j{a"}in' 'j{a"}id' 'j{a"}i' (<-'j{a"}{a"}ma')
        'j{a"}{a"}mata' 'j{a"}{a"}dakse' 'j{a"}{a"}da' 'j{a"}{a"}ma' 'j{a"}{a"}di' (<-'j{a"}{a"}ma')
        'm{u"}{u"}n' 'm{u"}{u"}d' 'm{u"}{u"}b' 'm{u"}{u"}s' 'm{u"}{u"}me' 'm{u"}{u"}te' 'm{u"}{u"}vad' (<-'m{u"}{u"}si')
        'm{u"}{u"}ksin' 'm{u"}{u"}ksid' 'm{u"}{u"}ks' 'm{u"}{u"}ksime' 'm{u"}{u"}ksite' (<-'m{u"}{u"}si')
        'm{u"}{u"}mata' 'm{u"}{u"}akse' 'm{u"}{u"}di' 'm{u"}{u"}a' 'm{u"}{u"}ma' (<-'m{u"}{u"}si')
        'loeb' 'loen' 'loed' 'loeme' 'loete' 'loevad' (<- 'luge')
        'loeks' 'loeksin' 'loeksid' 'loeksime' 'loeksite' (<- 'luge')
        'p{o~}en' 'p{o~}eb' 'p{o~}ed' 'p{o~}eme' 'p{o~}ete' 'p{o~}evad' (<- 'p{o~}de')
        'p{o~}eksin' 'p{o~}eks' 'p{o~}eksid' 'p{o~}eksime' 'p{o~}eksite' (<- 'p{o~}de')
        'laon' 'laob' 'laod' 'laome' 'laote' 'laovad' (<- 'ladu')
        'laoksin' 'laoks' 'laoksid' 'laoksime' 'laoksite' (<- 'ladu')
        'teeksin' 'teeks' 'teeksid' 'teeksime' 'teeksite' (<- 'tegi')
        'teen' 'teeb' 'teed' 'teeme' 'teete' 'teevad' (<- 'tegi')
        'tegemata' 'tehakse' 'tehti' 'tegema' 'teha' (<-'tegi')
        'n{a"}en' 'n{a"}eb' 'n{a"}ed' 'n{a"}eme' 'n{a"}ete' 'n{a"}evad' (<-'n{a"}gi')
        'n{a"}eksin' 'n{a"}eks' 'n{a"}eksid' 'n{a"}eksime' 'n{a"}eksite' (<-'n{a"}gi')
        'n{a"}gemata' 'n{a"}hakse' 'n{a"}hti' 'n{a"}ha' 'n{a"}gema' (<-'n{a"}gi')
    )
)


define stem as (
    not verb_exceptions
    // p1 isn't used by verb_exceptions
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do emphasis
        do ( verb or substantive )
        do undouble_kpt

    )
)
